Rules/ruu_patterns.lexd
PATTERNS
# Verbs
# Indicative
## NPFV
Nar? Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[-fut]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[1sy] [<fv>:]
Nar? Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[-fut]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[|[ind,i]]? Mood[ind] # All tenses besides nfut
Nar? Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[-fut]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[|[ind,e]]? Mood[ind] # All tenses besides nfut
### NFUT
Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[1sy] [<fv>:]
Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[|[ind,i]]? Mood[ind] # Affirmation of nfut
Neg[1] Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[i]? Mood[subj] # Negation of nfut besides reciprocal forms
Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[|[ind,e]]? Mood[ind] # Affirmation of nfut
Neg[1] Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[e]? Mood[subj] # Negation of nfut besides reciprocal forms
Neg[1] Subj TenseAspect[fut] Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[-pfv] Extensions[sbjv] # Negation of nfut reciprocal forms
## PFV
### Regular
Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[pst]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] (Perf[i] | PerfPortmanteau[i])
Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[pst]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] (Perf[e] | PerfPortmanteau[e])
### Irregular
Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[pst]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[pfv] [<pfv>:] Extensions[-sbjv]?
# Habitual
Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[|[fut,pst]]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[-sbjv,i]? Mood[ind] Habit
Neg[1]? Subj TenseAspect[|[fut,pst]]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[-sbjv,e]? Mood[ind] Habit
# Subjunctive
Neg[1]? Subj Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[i]? Mood[subj] # Subjunctive forms
Neg[1]? Subj Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[e]? Mood[subj] # Subjunctive forms
Neg[1]? Subj Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[-pfv] Extensions[subj] # Subjunctive reciprocal
# Imperative, Jussive, Hortative & Prohibitive
Subj Neg[2]? Obj? [<v>:] VerbRoot[-pfv] Mood
# Infinitive
Aug[o]? Inf TenseAspect[-fut]? [<v>:] VerbRoot[e] Extensions[|[ind,e]]? Mood[ind]
Aug[o]? Inf TenseAspect[-fut]? [<v>:] VerbRoot[i] Extensions[|[ind,i]]? Mood[ind]
# Copula
Neg[1]? Subj? Obj? Cop
PreCop Cop PosCop
NegCop

# Nouns
Aug[1]? NounQuant[1] [<n>:] NounRoot[1]
Aug[1]? NounQuant[1a] [<n>:] NounRoot[1a,-naug]
NounQuant[1a] [<n>:] NounRoot[1a,naug]
Aug[2]? NounQuant[2] [<n>:] NounRoot[2]
Aug[3]? NounQuant[3] [<n>:] NounRoot[3]
Aug[3]? NounQuant[3a] [<n>:] NounRoot[3a,-naug]
NounQuant[3a] [<n>:] NounRoot[3a,naug]
Aug[4]? NounQuant[4] [<n>:] NounRoot[4]
Aug[5]? NounQuant[5] [<n>:] NounRoot[5]
Aug[5]? NounQuant[5a] [<n>:] NounRoot[5a,-naug]
NounQuant[5a] [<n>:] NounRoot[5a,naug]
Aug[5]? NounQuant[5b] [<n>:] NounRoot[5b]
Aug[6]? NounQuant[6] [<n>:] NounRoot[6]
Aug[7]? NounQuant[7] [<n>:] NounRoot[7]
Aug[8]? NounQuant[8] [<n>:] NounRoot[8]
Aug[9]? NounQuant[9] [<n>:] NounRoot[9]
Aug[9]? NounQuant[9a] [<n>:] NounRoot[9a,-naug]
NounQuant[9a] [<n>:] NounRoot[9a,naug]
Aug[10]? NounQuant[10] [<n>:] NounRoot[10]
Aug[10]? NounQuant[10a] [<n>:] NounRoot[10a,-naug]
NounQuant[10a] [<n>:] NounRoot[10a,naug]
Aug[11]? NounQuant[11] [<n>:] NounRoot[11]
Aug[12]? NounQuant[12] [<n>:] NounRoot[|[12,mass]]
Aug[13]? NounQuant[13] [<n>:] NounRoot[mass]
Aug[14]? NounQuant[14] [<n>:] NounRoot[|[14,mass]]
Aug[15]? NounQuant[15] [<n>:] NounRoot[15]
Aug[16]? NounQuant[16] [<n>:] NounRoot[16]
Aug[20]? NounQuant[20] [<n>:] NounRoot[-mass]
Aug[22]? NounQuant[22] [<n>:] NounRoot

# Locative Noun Classes
Aug[17]? [<n>:] NounRoot[17]
Aug[18]? [<n>:] NounRoot[18]
[<n>:] NounRoot[23]

# Personal Pronouns
PersPron [<pro>:] Additive?

# Demonstrative Pronouns
DemPron[-ndist,-med] [<dem>:] Distance[dist]
DemPron[-med] [<dem>:] Distance[prox]
:Aug[a] DemPron[|[2,6,12,16,22],-nmed] [<dem>:] Distance[med]
:Aug[e] DemPron[|[4,5,7,8,9,10,23]] [<dem>:] Distance[med]
:Aug[o] DemPron[|[1,3,11,13,14,15,17,18,20]] [<dem>:] Distance[med]

# Possessive Pronouns
PossesseePrefix AssocMarker PossessorSuffix

# Adjectives
Aug[o]? AdjAgree[|[1,3,11,13,14,15,17,18,20]] [<adj>:] AdjRoot
Aug[a]? AdjAgree[|[2,6,12,16,22]] [<adj>:] AdjRoot
Aug[e]? AdjAgree[|[4,5,7,8,9,10]] [<adj>:] AdjRoot

# Genetive markers
Aug[o]? Gen[|[1,3,11,13,14,15,17,18,20]]
Aug[a]? Gen[|[2,6,12,16,22]]
Aug[e]? Gen[|[4,5,7,8,9,10]]

# Other
Other

LEXICON Gen
<1.gen>:wa[1]
<2.gen>:ba[2]
<3.gen>:gwa[3]
<4.gen>:gya[4]
<4.gen>:ya[4]
<5.gen>:lya[5]
<6.gen>:ga[6]
<7.gen>:kya[7]
<8.gen>:bya[8]
<9.gen>:ya[9]
<10.gen>:za[10]
<11.gen>:lwa[11]
<12.gen>:ka[12]
<13.gen>:twa[13]
<14.gen>:bwa[14]
<15.gen>:kwa[15]
<20.gen>:gwa[20]
<22.gen>:ga[22]

LEXICON Nar
<nar>:ni>
<nar>:n'>
<nar>:n>

LEXICON NegCop
<neg.cop>:ti

LEXICON Cop
<cop>:li
<cop>:ta
<cop>:bba
<cop>:ni

LEXICON PreCop
<16sbj>:wa>
<17sbj>:ku>
<18sbj>:mu>
<23sbj>:e>

LEXICON PosCop
<16.loc>:>wo
<17.loc>:>ku
<18.loc>:>mu
<23.loc>:>yo

LEXICON Inf
<inf>:ku>

LEXICON Neg
<neg>:ti>[1]
<neg>:ta>[2]

LEXICON Subj
<1sg.sbj>:n>
<1pl.sbj>:tu>
<2sg.sbj>:o>
<2pl.sbj>:mu>
<1sbj>:a>
<2sbj>:ba>
<3sbj>:gu>
<4sbj>:gi>
<5sbj>:li>
<6sbj>:ga>
<7sbj>:ki>
<8sbj>:bi>
<9sbj>:e>
<9sbj>:gi>
<10sbj>:zi>
<11sbj>:lu>
<12sbj>:ka>
<13sbj>:tu>
<14sbj>:bu>
<15sbj>:ku>
<16sbj>:wa>
<17sbj>:ku>
<18sbj>:mu>
<20sbj>:gu>
<22sbj>:ga>
<23sbj>:e>

LEXICON TenseAspect
<pst>:a>[pst]
<fut>:a>[fut]
<rfut>:li>
<prog>:ku>
<pers>:kya>

LEXICON Obj
<1sg.obj>:n>
<1pl.obj>:tu>
<2sg.obj>:ku>
<2pl.obj>:ba>
<1obj>:mu>
<2obj>:ba>
<3obj>:gu>
<4obj>:gi>
<5obj>:li>
<6obj>:ga>
<7obj>:ki>
<8obj>:bi>
<9obj>:gi>
<10obj>:zi>
<11obj>:lu>
<12obj>:ka>
<13obj>:tu>
<14obj>:bu>
<15obj>:ku>
<20obj>:gu>
<22obj>:ga>
<refl>:e>

LEXICON Extensions
<caus>:>y[i,e]
<recp>:>angan[ind]
<recp:sbjv>:engane[sbjv]
<appl>:>il[i]
<caus>:>isy[i]
<pass>:>ibw[i]
<appl>:>el[e]
<caus>:>esy[e]
<pass>:>ebw[e]

LEXICON PerfPortmanteau
<appl:pfv>:iile[i]
<caus:pfv>:isilye[i]
<caus:pfv>:ilye[i]
<appl:caus:pfv>:iilye[i]
<pass:pfv>:iibwe[i]
<appl:pfv>:eile[e]
<caus:pfv>:esilye[e]
<caus:pfv>:elye[e]
<appl:caus:pfv>:eilye[e]
<pass:pfv>:eibwe[e]
<recp:pfv>:angaine[i,e]

LEXICON Mood
<fv>:>a[ind]
<sbjv>:>e[subj]

LEXICON Habit
<hab>:>nga

LEXICON Perf
<pfv>:ile[i]
<pfv>:ele[e]

LEXICON PossesseePrefix
<1>:wa>
<2>:ba>
<3>:gu>
<4>:gi>
<4>:za>
<5>:li>
<6>:ga>
<7>:ki>
<8>:bi>
<9>:ya>
<10>:za>
<11>:lu>
<12>:ka>
<13>:tu>
<14>:bu>
<15>:ku>
<20>:gu>
<22>:ga>

LEXICON PossessorSuffix
<1sg>:nge
<1pl>:iswe
<2sg>:mu
<2pl>:nywe
<1>:mwe{ii}
<2>:bwe
<3>:gwo
<4>:gyo
<5>:lyo
<6>:go
<7>:kyo
<8>:byo
<9>:yo
<10>:zo
<11>:lwo
<12>:ko
<13>:two
<14>:bwo
<15>:kwo
<20>:gwo
<22>:go

LEXICON AssocMarker
<assoc>:a

LEXICON Distance
<prox>:>ni[prox]
<med>:>o[med]
<dist>:>di[dist]

LEXICON DemPron
<1>:{o}[1]
<2>:b{a}[2]
<3>:gu[3]
<4>:gi[4]
<5>:li[5]
<6>:g{a}[6]
<7>:ki[7]
<8>:bi[8]
<9>:{e}[9]
<9>:gi[9,ndist]
<10>:z{i}[10]
<11>:lu[11]
<12>:k{a}[12]
<13>:tu[13]
<14>:bu[14]
<15>:ku[15]
<16>:wa[16,nmed]
<16>:a[16,nmed]
<16>:w[16,med]
<17>:ku[17]
<18>:mu[18]
<20>:gu[20]
<22>:g{a}[22]
<23>:{e}[23]

LEXICON PersPron
<1sg>:nje
<1pl>:iswe
<2sg>:we
<2pl>:nywe
<1>:ye
<2>:bo
<3>:gwo
<4>:gyo
<5>:lyo
<6>:go
<7>:kyo
<8>:byo
<9>:yo
<9>:gyo
<10>:zo
<11>:lwo
<12>:ko
<13>:two
<14>:bwo
<15>:kwo
<20>:gwo
<22>:go

LEXICON Additive
<add.foc>:>na

LEXICON NounQuant
<1>:mu>[1]
<1>:>[1a]
<2>:ba>[2]
<3>:mu>[3]
<3>:>[3a]
<4>:mi>[4]
<5>:{iy}>[5]
<5>:>[5a]
<5>:li>[5b]
<6>:ma>[6]
<7>:ki>[7]
<8>:bi>[8]
<9>:n>[9]
<9>:>[9a]
<10>:{n}>[10]
<10>:>[10a]
<11>:lu>[11]
<12>:ka>[12]
<13>:tu>[13]
<14>:bu>[14]
<15>:ku>[15]
<16>:wa>[16]
<20>:gu>[20]
<22>:ga>[22]

LEXICON Aug
<aug>:o>[1,3,11,13,14,15,17,18,20,o]
<aug>:a>[2,6,12,16,22,a]
<aug>:e>[4,5,7,8,9,10,e]

LEXICON AdjAgree
<1>:mu>[1]
<2>:ba>[2]
<3>:gu>[3]
<4>:gi>[4]
<4>:zi>[4]
<5>:li>[5]
<6>:ga>[6]
<7>:ki>[7]
<8>:bi>[8]
<9>:n>[9]
<9>:gi>[9]
<10>:zi>[10]
<11>:lu>[11]
<12>:ka>[12]
<13>:tu>[13]
<14>:bu>[14]
<15>:ku>[15]
<20>:go>[20]
<22>:ga>[22]
